Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2215
Involuntary dissolution; procedure.

Every action for the involuntary dissolution of a corporation failing to comply with the provisions of section 21-2213 shall be commenced by the Attorney General either in the district court of the county in which the registered office of the corporation is situated or in the district court of Lancaster County. Summons shall issue and be served as in other civil actions. If process is returned not found, the Attorney General shall cause publication to be made as in other civil cases in some newspaper published in the county where the last-known registered office of the corporation is situated, containing a notice of pendency of such action, the title of the court, the title of the action, and the date on and after which default may be entered. The Attorney General shall cause a copy of such notice to be mailed to the corporation at its last-known registered office or mailing address within ten days after the first publication thereof. The certificate of the Attorney General of the mailing of such notice shall be prima facie evidence thereof. Such notice shall be published at least once each week for two successive weeks, and the first publication thereof may begin at any time after the summons has been returned. Unless a corporation shall have been served with summons, no default shall be taken against it earlier than thirty days after the first publication of such notice.

Laws 1969, c. 121, § 15, p. 559.